Massachusetts, session 194th, S2440.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 161A of the General Laws is hereby amended by adding the following section:-
Section 53. The Massachusetts Bay Transportation Authority shall designate all
commuter rail stations in the city of Boston as Zone 1A to promote fare equity for commuters in
the city of Boston.
of 1